Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.140

Court rooms.

If the proper authority neglects to provide any superior court with rooms, furniture, fuel, lights and stationery suitable and sufficient for the transaction of its business and for the jury attending upon it, if there be one, the court may order the sheriff to do so, at the place within the county designated by law for holding such court; and the expense incurred by the sheriff in carrying such order into effect, when ascertained and ordered to be paid by the court, is a charge upon the county.

[ 1955 c 38 s 14; 1891 c 54 s 11; RRS s 68.]